src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_UUHL_STEM_2_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - tʼahlgúuhl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_UUHL_STEM_2

     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Imm+Pres: tʼahlgúlga
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Simp+Pres: tʼahlgúlgang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Dir+Past: tʼahlgúlgan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+NonFact: tʼahlgúl.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: tʼahlgúlgang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Pres+Hab: tʼahlgúlganggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: tʼahlgúlgangang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Dir+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúlgiinii
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Interr+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúlgaangaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Indir+Past+Hab: tʼahlgúlgaangaan
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Interr+Near+Fut: tʼahlgúlang k̲asaʼáa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Near+Fut: tʼahlgúlang k̲asaʼáang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: tʼahlgúlang k̲asaasdláa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+VNear+Fut: tʼahlgúlang k̲asaasdláang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: tʼahlgúlgangʼwaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: tʼahlgúlgangʼwaang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: tʼahlgúlgangʼwaa.ang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: tʼahlgúlgangʼanggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: tʼahlgúlgangʼangang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: tʼahlgúlang k̲asaaʼáng
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Near+Fut: tʼahlgúlang k̲asaaʼánggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: tʼahlgúlang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: tʼahlgúlang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: tʼahlgúlgangʼangʼwaa
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: tʼahlgúlgangʼangʼwaang
     tʼahlgúuhl+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: tʼahlgúlgangʼangʼwaa.ang
